Washington statutes.
RCW 35.45.060

Interest on bonds—How payable.

The city or town treasurer shall pay interest on the bonds issued against local improvement funds out of the local improvement fund from which the bonds are payable.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.45.060. Prior: 1911 c 98 s 54, part; RRS s 9407, part.]